Hawaii statutes.
[§269-15.51] Contested cases. [Section
repealed July 1, 2019. L 2016, c 48, §14.] (a) Chapter 91 shall
apply to every contested case arising under this chapter except where chapter
91 conflicts with this chapter, in which case this chapter shall apply. Any
other law to the contrary notwithstanding, including chapter 91, any contested
case under this chapter shall be appealed from a final decision and order or a
preliminary ruling that is of the nature defined by section 91-14(a) upon the
record directly to the supreme court for final decision. Only a person
aggrieved in a contested case proceeding provided for in this chapter may
appeal from the final decision and order or preliminary ruling. For the
purposes of this section, the term "person aggrieved" includes an
agency that is a party to a contested case proceeding before that agency or
another agency.

(b) The court shall give priority to contested
case appeals of significant statewide importance over all other civil or
administrative appeals or matters and shall decide these appeals as
expeditiously as possible. [L 2016, c 48, §4]

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §11.

Cross References

Appeals, see §269-15.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next